Utah statutes.
67-19a-302.   Levels of procedure.

(1)  A career service employee may grieve the issues specified under Subsection 67-19a-202(1)(a) to all levels of the grievance procedure described in Section 67-19a-402.

(2) (a)  A career service employee may grieve all other matters only to the level of the department head.

(b)  The decision of the department head on a matter under Subsection (2)(a) is final and may not be advanced to the office.

